Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2446
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Concealed Handgun Permit Act.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 20.